California, session 20252026, SB1338.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10856 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:10856. (a) (1) A person shall not interfere with the transport of a vehicle to a storage facility, auction, or dealer by an individual who is employed by a repossession agency or who is licensed pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 7500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code once repossession is complete as provided in Section 7507.12 of the Business and Professions Code.(2) A violation of this subdivision shall be punishable either as an infraction, or as a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding four hundred dollars ($400), imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding 60 days, or both such fine and imprisonment. as follows:(A) By a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200).(B) For a second infraction occurring within one year of a prior infraction that resulted in a conviction, a fine not exceeding four hundred dollars ($400).(C) For a third or subsequent infraction occurring within one year of two or more prior infractions that resulted in convictions, a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).(3) This subdivision shall not apply to a peace officer while acting in an official capacity.(b) (1) Any tow yard, impounding agency, or governmental agency, or any person acting on behalf of those entities, shall not refuse to release a vehicle or other collateral to anyone that is legally entitled to that vehicle or other collateral.(2) This subdivision shall not apply to a vehicle being held for evidence by law enforcement or a prosecuting attorney.(c) For purposes of this section, “interfere” means to physically impede by obstructing, hindering, or preventing movement, including removing or disabling equipment used for transporting the vehicle.SEC. 2.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.